en: Activity Monitors
xx: Activity Monitors
cs: Měřiče aktivity
da: Aktivitetsmålere
de: Aktivitätsmonitore
es: Monitores de actividad
fr: Moniteurs d'activité
it: Monitor di attività
ja: アクティビティ モニター
nl: Activiteitsmeters
no: Aktivitetsmonitorer
pl: Urządzenia do pomiaru aktywności fizycznej
pt: Monitores de atividade
ru: Устройства для отслеживания физической активности
sv: Aktivitetsmätare
tr: Etkinlik İzleyiciler

en: Blood Glucose Meters
xx: Blood Glucose Meters
cs: Glukometry
da: Blodsukkermålere
de: Blutzuckermessgeräte
es: Medidores de glucosa en sangre
fr: Glucomètres
it: Misuratori glucosio nel sangue
ja: 血糖値測定器
nl: Bloedglucosemeters
no: Blodsukkermålere
pl: Glukometry
pt: Medidores de glicose
ru: Глюкометры
sv: Blodglykosmätare
tr: Şeker Ölçüm Cihazları

en: Blood Pressure Monitors
xx: Blood Pressure Monitors
cs: Měřiče krevního tlaku
da: Blodtryksmålere
de: Blutdruckmessgeräte
es: Monitores de presión sanguínea
fr: Tensiomètres
it: Misuratori pressione sanguigna
ja: 血圧計
nl: Bloeddrukmeters
no: Blodtrykksmålere
pl: Ciśnieniomierze
pt: Monitores de pressão
ru: Тонометры
sv: Blodtrycksmätare
tr: Tansiyon Aletleri

en: Body Fat Analyzers
xx: Body Fat Analyzers
cs: Analyzátory tělesného tuku
da: Test af kropsfedt
de: Körperfettanalyse
es: Analizadores de grasa corporal
fr: Dispositifs d'analyse du tissu adipeux
it: Analizzatori grasso corporeo
ja: 体脂肪計
nl: Apparaten voor lichaamsvetanalyse
no: Kroppsfettmålere
pl: Urządzenia do pomiaru tkanki tłuszczowej
pt: Analisadores de gordura
ru: Анализаторы жира
sv: Kroppsfettanalyserare
tr: Vücut Yağ Analiz Cihazları

en: Body Weight Scales
xx: Body Weight Scales
cs: Osobní váhy
da: Badevægte
de: Personenwaagen
es: Básculas de peso corporal
fr: Pèse-personne
it: Bilance pesapersone
ja: 体重計
nl: Badkamerweegschalen
no: Personvekter
pl: Wagi osobowe
pt: Balanças de banheiro
ru: Напольные весы
sv: Personvågar
tr: Tartılar

en: Breathalyzers
xx: Breathalyzers
cs: Analyzátory dechu
da: Ballontest
de: Alkoholmessgeräte
es: Alcoholímetro
fr: Éthylomètres
it: Analizzatori alito
ja: アルコール検知器
nl: Ademanalyseapparaten
no: Promilletester
pl: Alkomaty
pt: Bafômetro
ru: Индикаторные трубки
sv: Alkotestapparater
tr: Alkolmetreler

en: Cholesterol Analyzers
xx: Cholesterol Analyzers
cs: Měřiče cholesterolu
da: Kolesteroltest
de: Cholesterinmessgeräte
es: Analizadores de colesterol
fr: Analyseurs de cholestérol
it: Analizzatori del colesterolo
ja: コレステロール検査器
nl: Cholesterolanalyseapparaten
no: Apparater for kolesterolanalyse
pl: Urządzenia do pomiaru cholesterolu
pt: Analisadores de colesterol
ru: Анализаторы холестерина
sv: Kolesterolanalyserare
tr: Kolesterol Analiz Cihazları

en: Fertility Monitors and Ovulation Tests
xx: Fertility Monitors and Ovulation Tests
cs: Sledování plodných dnů a testování ovulace
da: Fertilitetsmonitorer og ægløsningstests
de: Fruchtbarkeitsmonitore & Ovulationstests
es: Tests de ovulación y monitores de fertilidad
fr: Moniteurs de fertilité et tests d'ovulation
it: Test di ovulazione e monitoraggio della fertilità
ja: 排卵測定器・検査薬
nl: Vruchtbaarheidsmonitors en ovulatietests
no: Fruktbarhetsovervåkere og eggløsningstester
pl: Monitory płodności i testy owulacyjne
pt: Testes de ovulação e monitores de fertilidade
ru: Мониторы фертильности и тесты на овуляцию
sv: Fertilitetsmonitorer och ägglossningstest
tr: Doğurganlık Monitörleri ve Ovulasyon Testleri

en: Fertility Tests & Monitors
xx: Fertility Tests & Monitors
cs: Těhotenské testy a monitory plodných dnů
da: Fertilitetstests og -monitorer
de: Fruchtbarkeitstests & -monitore
es: Monitores y tests de fertilidad
fr: Tests et moniteurs de fertilité
it: Test di fertilità
ja: 受胎検査・モニター
nl: Vruchtbaarheidstests
no: Fertilitetstester og -monitorer
pl: Testy i monitory płodności
pt: Testes e monitores de fertilidade
ru: Тесты и мониторы фертильности
sv: Fertilitetstest och monitorer
tr: Doğurganlık Testleri ve İzleme Cihazları

en: Ovulation Tests
xx: Ovulation Tests
cs: Ovulační testy
da: Ægløsningstests
de: Ovulationstests
es: Tests de ovulación
fr: Tests d'ovulation
it: Test di ovulazione
ja: 排卵検査
nl: Ovulatietests
no: Eggløsningstester
pl: Testy owulacyjne
pt: Testes de ovulação
ru: Тесты на овуляцию
sv: Ägglossningstest
tr: Ovülasyon Testleri

en: Medical Thermometers
xx: Medical Thermometers
cs: Lékařské teploměry
da: Medicinske termometre
de: Fieberthermometer
es: Termómetros médicos
fr: Thermomètres à usage médical
it: Termometri medici
ja: 医療用体温計
nl: Medische thermometers
no: Medisinske termometre
pl: Termometry medyczne
pt: Termômetros médicos
ru: Медицинские термометры
sv: Medicinska termometrar
tr: Medikal Termometreler

en: Prenatal Heart Rate Monitors
xx: Prenatal Heart Rate Monitors
cs: Prenatální odposlechy
da: Fosterhjertelydsmålere
de: Pränatale Herzfrequenzmesser
es: Monitores de escucha de latidos fetales
fr: Moniteurs cardiaques fœtaux
it: Rilevatori del battito cardiaco fetale
ja: 胎児心音モニター
nl: Hartslagmonitors voor prenatale zorg
no: Hjertemonitorer for fostre
pl: Monitory do badania pracy serca płodu
pt: Monitores cardíacos para pré-natal
ru: Пренатальные кардиомониторы
sv: Prenatal hjärtövervakning
tr: Doğum Öncesi Kalp Monitörleri

en: Pulse Oximeters
xx: Pulse Oximeters
cs: Pulzní oxymetry
da: Pulsoximetre
de: Pulsoximeter
es: Pulsioxímetros
fr: Oxymètres
it: Pulsossimetri
ja: パルスオキシメーター
nl: Pulse-oxymeters
no: Puls-oksimetre
pl: Pulsoksymetry
pt: Oxímetros de pulso
ru: Пульсоксиметры
sv: Pulsoximetrar
tr: Nabız Oksimetreleri

en: Condoms
xx: Condoms
cs: Kondomy
da: Kondomer
de: Kondome
es: Condones
fr: Préservatifs
it: Profilattici
ja: コンドーム
nl: Condooms
no: Kondomer
pl: Prezerwatywy
pt: Preservativos
ru: Презервативы
sv: Kondomer
tr: Prezervatifler

en: Conductivity Gels & Lotions
xx: Conductivity Gels & Lotions
cs: Vodivé gely a mléka
da: Ledende geléer og lotions
de: Kontaktgels & -lotionen
es: Lociones y geles de conductividad
fr: Solutions et gels conducteurs
it: Lozioni e gel conduttivi
ja: 導電性ジェル・ローション
nl: Geleidende gels en lotions
no: Konduktivitetsgel og -kremer
pl: Żele i balsamy przewodzące
pt: Loções e géis condutores
ru: Проводящие гели и лосьоны
sv: Konduktivitetsgeléer och -lotioner
tr: İletkenlik Jelleri ve Losyonları

en: Contraceptive Cases
xx: Contraceptive Cases
cs: Krabičky na antikoncepci
da: Æsker til prævention
de: Behälter für Verhütungsmittel
es: Estuches para anticonceptivos
fr: Boîtes de rangement de contraceptifs
it: Custodie per contraccettivi
ja: 避妊薬ケース
nl: Voorbehoedsmiddelendoosjes
no: Etuier for prevensjonsmidler
pl: Antykoncepcja
pt: Caixas de contraceptivos
ru: Боксы для контрацептивов
sv: Preventivmedelsförpackningar
tr: Doğum Kontrol Hapı Muhafazaları

en: First Aid
xx: First Aid
cs: První pomoc
da: Førstehjælp
de: Erste Hilfe
es: Primeros auxilios
fr: Premiers secours
it: Primo soccorso
ja: 応急手当用品
nl: EHBO
no: Førstehjelp
pl: Pierwsza pomoc
pt: Primeiros socorros
ru: Средства оказания первой помощи
sv: Första hjälpen
tr: İlk Yardım

en: Antiseptics & Cleaning Supplies
xx: Antiseptics & Cleaning Supplies
cs: Antiseptika a čisticí prostředky
da: Antiseptiske og renseartikler
de: Antiseptika & Reinigung
es: Productos antisépticos y desinfectantes
fr: Antiseptiques et désinfectants
it: Prodotti pulizia e antisettici
ja: 消毒薬・衛生用品
nl: Ontsmettende en reinigingsmiddelen
no: Desinfeksjonsmidler og rengjøringsutstyr
pl: Środki antyseptyczne i czyszczące
pt: Antissépticos e suprimentos para limpeza
ru: Антисептики
sv: Antiseptikum och rengöringsmaterial
tr: Antiseptikler ve Temizlik Malzemeleri

en: Cast & Bandage Protectors
xx: Cast & Bandage Protectors
cs: Ochranné návleky na sádru a obvazy
da: Gips og bandagebeskyttere
de: Schutzhüllen für Gipsverbände
es: Protectores para escayola y vendajes
fr: Protections pour plâtres et bandage
it: Protezioni per gesso e fasciature
ja: ギプス・包帯用防水カバー
nl: Gips- en verbandbeschermers
no: Gips- og bandasjebeskyttere
pl: Osłony na gips i bandaż
pt: Protetores de gesso e ataduras
ru: Средства для защиты гипса и бинтовых повязок
sv: Gips- och bandageskydd
tr: Alçı ve Bandaj Koruyucular

en: Eye Wash Supplies
xx: Eye Wash Supplies
cs: Pomůcky na mytí očí
da: Artikler til øjenvask
de: Augenwaschbedarf
es: Productos para la limpieza ocular
fr: Fournitures pour le lavage des yeux
it: Prodotti lavaggio oculare
ja: 洗眼用品
nl: Benodigdheden voor oogwassing
no: Øyevaskprodukter
pl: Środki do przemywania oczu
pt: Suprimentos de soluções para lavar os olhos
ru: Принадлежности для промывания глаз
sv: Material för ögontvätt
tr: Göz Banyosu Ürünleri